Mississippi, session 2026, HB1288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 28 of Chapter 549, Laws of 2023, as amended by Section 1 of Chapter 510, Laws of 2024, is amended as follows: Section 28.  Monies transferred pursuant to Sections 1 and 3 of this act into the 2023 Local Improvements Projects Fund shall be disbursed by the Department of Finance and Administration, pursuant to the authority granted by the department's appropriation bill, Senate Bill No. 3043, 2023 Regular Session, to spend those monies, as follows: (a)  To assist the City of Indianola, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with purchasing six (6) new police cars for the city's police department.................................... $400,000.00 (b)  To assist Sunflower County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with completing construction of the county's Transitional Shelter for Homeless families................................... .................................................... $300,000.00 (c)  To Tishomingo County, Mississippi, to assist the Belmont Volunteer Fire Department in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment............................................ $25,000.00 (d)  To Alcorn County, Mississippi, to assist the Rienzi Volunteer Fire Department in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment............................................ $25,000.00 (e)  To assist Prentiss County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with replacing bridge SA 59-029 and repaving and restoring County Road 1475 and County Road 1481 located in Supervisors District 5 in Prentiss County................................... $450,000.00 (f)  To assist Alcorn County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with ongoing repair and renovation of the Alcorn County Courthouse........................................ $1,000,000.00 (g)  To Kossuth, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with renovation of the LC Follin Community Center..... .................................................... $150,000.00 (h)  To assist the City of Corinth, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair and renovation to include the Coliseum and South Corinth High School............................ $500,000.00 (i)  To Alcorn County, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with construction of a new fire station for the Jacinto Volunteer Fire Department............................ $100,000.00 (j)  To assist Alcorn County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with special operations at the county's Emergency Management Agency.............................................. $400,000.00 (k)  To assist the City of Corinth, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to and maintenance of Harper Road.................................................... $500,000.00 (l)  To assist the City of Corinth, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with general assistance to Corinth Theatre-Arts..................................................... $25,000.00 (m)  To assist the City of Jackson, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with renovations and upgrades for the Jackson Planetarium....................................... $1,000,000.00 (n)  To assist the City of Waynesboro with infrastructure improvements at the Waynesboro Sports Complex................... .................................................. $1,500,000.00 (o)  To assist George County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with construction of the Agricola Multipurpose Center in George County, Mississippi........................... $400,000.00 (p)  To assist George County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction of the Basin-Barton Multipurpose Facility.............................. $1,800,000.00 (q)  To assist Jackson County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with construction of a multipurpose arena............................................... $750,000.00 (r)  To assist Itawamba County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair and renovation of the Itawamba County Courthouse.................................................. $1,500,000.00 (s)  To assist the Town of Tremont, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair and remodeling of the town's Town Hall.................................................... $150,000.00 (t)  To assist Itawamba County, Mississippi, with providing funds to Volunteer Fire Departments located in the county, at the discretion of the Fire Coordinator................... $150,000.00 (u)  To assist the City of Fulton, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with renovation and remodeling of the city's City Hall and costs associated with street repairs .................................................... $500,000.00 (v)  To assist Itawamba Community College in paying costs associated with capital construction related to the Health Sciences program........................................... $1,500,000.00 (w)  To assist the City of Jackson, Mississippi, to provide a federal match to the Jackson Redevelopment Authority for the train station............................................. $420,000.00 (x)  To assist the Lighthouse Academy for Dyslexia in Ocean Springs, Mississippi, in paying costs for general purposes for dyslexia services............................................ $200,000.00 (y)  To assist the City of Long Beach, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with purchasing portable equipment including a portable stage to promote tourism............................. $200,000.00 (z)  To assist Lee County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of a fire truck for the Richmond Volunteer Fire Department...................................... $350,000.00 (aa)  To assist the Town of Tunica, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road improvements............... $500,000.00 (ab)  To assist the Town of Marks, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with making water and sewer improvements in the town.................................................... $500,000.00 (ac)  To assist the Town of Coldwater, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with paving the town square.................... .................................................... $500,000.00 (ad)  To assist the Town of Coldwater, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of fire trucks................ .................................................... $250,000.00 (ae)  To assist the City of Pascagoula, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with making upgrades and improvements to the Pascagoula City Hall building and related facilities....................... .................................................. $2,000,000.00 (af)  To assist the City of Pascagoula, Mississippi, for the Pascagoula Police Department in providing an East Pascagoula Police SubStation........................................ $2,000,000.00 (ag)  To assist the Petal School District Board of Trustees in paying costs associated with the repair and renovation of and upgrades and improvements to the district's Central Office building and related facilities in Petal, Mississippi................................ .................................................. $1,000,000.00 (ah)  To assist Lauderdale County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with building a new fire station for the Bailey Volunteer Fire Department.......................................... $100,000.00 (ai)  To assist Tishomingo County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs to the Tishomingo County Courthouse $500,000.00 (aj)  To assist Alcorn County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with building a new fire station on Kendrick Road for the Farmington Volunteer Fire Department................. $100,000.00 (ak)  To assist the City of Lexington, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of sewage pumping and vacuuming equipment and making street improvements.............. $100,000.00 (al)  To assist the Village of Eden with construction and repair of Town Hall and a safe room.................. $100,000.00 (am)  To assist Holmes County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with renovation of the Holmes County Courthouse .................................................... $150,000.00 (an)  To assist the Jackson Public School District with the Career Development Center in paying costs associated with parking lot resurfacing including restriping and drainage repairs .................................................... $250,000.00 (ao)  To assist the Jackson Public School District with the Career Development Center in paying costs associated with trade shop repairs and upgrades, including roof leak repairs .................................................... $250,000.00 (ap)  To assist the Jackson Public School District with the Career Development Center in paying costs associated with repair, renovation, furnishing and equipping of and upgrades and improvements to the Jackson Public School District's Career Development Center in Jackson, Mississippi................................. $100,000.00 (aq)  To assist Wilkinson County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the completion of construction, furnishing and equipping of a recreation center............................... $500,000.00 (ar)  To assist Harrison County, Mississippi, with the following fire stations with various costs, funds are to be allocated equally:  Vidalia Fire Station, Delisle Fire Station, Cuevas Fire and Rescue Station, and Henderson Point Fire Station............................................. $100,000.00 (as)  To assist the City of Pass Christian, Mississippi, with various costs for the city's Fire Department........... $25,000.00 (at)  To assist the City of Pass Christian, Mississippi, with various costs for the city's Police Department ..................................................... $25,000.00 (au)  To assist the City of New Albany, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with central business district renovations, upgrades and improvements as part of the city's downtown revitalization project.................................................... $500,000.00 (av)  To assist Union County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the repair and renovation of and upgrades and improvements to the Union County Courthouse and Veterans Park in New Albany.............................................. $500,000.00 (aw)  To assist the City of Jackson, Mississippi, acting through its Department of Planning and Development, in paying costs associated with the acquisition, demolition and/or removal of blighted properties in the City of Jackson and in the Mississippi House of Representatives District 71.......................... $250,000.00 (ax)  To assist Lincoln County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the acquisition and installation of HVAC systems and equipment for the county courthouse............................. .................................................... $250,000.00 (ay)  To assist Lincoln County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with renovations to the jail............... $500,000.00 (az)  To assist Desoto County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with purchasing equipment for Alphaba-Cockrum-Ingrams Mill Volunteer Fire Department....................................... ..................................................... $25,000.00 (ba)  To assist Desoto County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with purchasing equipment for the Lewisburg Volunteer Fire Department........................................... $25,000.00 (bb)  To assist Desoto County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchasing of equipment for the Love Volunteer Fire Department........................................... $25,000.00 (bc)  To assist the City of Oxford, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair and renovation of a building to be used by the City of Oxford Police Department............... $4,000,000.00 (bd)  To assist Lafayette County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the extension of West Oxford Loop in Lafayette County............................................ $1,000,000.00 (be)  To assist the City of D'Iberville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Mallett Road and Sangani Boulevard intersection and widening project............................... $1,000,000.00 (bf)  To assist the City of Philadelphia, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with purchasing police cars for the Philadelphia Police Department.................................... $160,000.00 (bg)  To assist Kemper County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements within the county.................. .................................................... $300,000.00 (bh)  To assist the Town of Scooba, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with town improvements................ $50,000.00 (bi)  To assist Kemper County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with purchasing fire equipment for the Kemper County Volunteer Fire Department....................................... $60,000.00 (bj)  To assist the Porterville Water Association in paying costs associated with water line improvements................... .......................................................$200,000.00 (bk)  To assist East Mississippi Community College in paying costs associated with upgrades to equipment, furnishings and facilities for the Career Technical Education Program........................................... $2,000,000.00 (bl)  To assist the Boys and Girls Club of Biloxi in paying costs associated with providing general support for the club $1,000,000.00 (bm)  To assist Warren County, Mississippi, in paying costs to assist the Warren County Sheriff's Office with site work and infrastructure improvements to the future Warren County Jail site.................................................. $1,000,000.00 (bn)  To assist Madison County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Reunion Parkway and Bozeman Road expansion project................................................. $12,000,000.00 (bo)  To assist the Town of Edwards, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to the town's fire station............................................. $250,000.00 (bp)  To assist the Town of Raymond, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair and rehabilitation of the water tank on the town square in downtown Raymond and the Raymond water tank on the Hinds Community College campus........................................ .................................................... $250,000.00 (bq)  To assist Clay County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with paving and resurfacing of Lake Grove Road and Randle Road in Supervisors District 4 in Clay County........................ .................................................. $1,000,000.00 (br)  To assist Monroe County, Mississippi, with costs associated for the Prairie Rural Community Development Club to renovate the old Prairie School Building for use as a multi-purpose center.................................................... $250,000.00 (bs)  To assist the City of West Point, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with renovations to City Hall .................................................... $500,000.00 (bt)  To assist Greene County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road construction and road repairs in the county.............................................. $500,000.00 (bu)  To assist the City of Clinton, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with Phase II of site work for and construction and development of streets, street lighting and signals, electrical and communications distribution systems and equipment, water system and sewer system infrastructure and related infrastructure, public parking, structured public parking, public plaza, walking trails, and in support of any planned improvements to adjacent U.S. Highway 80 intersections by the Mississippi Department of Transportation within an area bound by U.S. Highway 80, Springridge Road, Interstate 20 and Clinton-Raymond Road/Madison Street in the City of Clinton .................................................. $8,000,000.00 (bv)  To assist the City of Clinton, Mississippi, in paying  costs associated with the Clinton Raymond Bolton Edwards Water and Sewer Plant Capacity Expansion project.................. $20,000,000.00 (bw)  To assist the town of Gloster to support the Gloster Southern Railroad Project.......................... $8,000,000.00 (bx)  To assist the Town of Flora, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with water, sewer and drainage from Odom Road to Jackson Street and water infrastructure from McGraw Street to Peach Street.................................................. $2,500,000.00 (by)  To assist the Department of Finance and Administration, Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, in paying costs associated with completing renovations at the Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame................................................ $500,000.00 (bz)  To assist the City of Greenville, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs and renovations to Frisby Park, Greenville Municipal, Maude Bryan Park and Rounds Park................................................ $500,000.00 (ca)  To assist the City of Picayune, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with construction, equipping and furnishing of a new burn building and any related structures and facilities for the Picayune Fire Department to replace the existing burn building. $350,000.00 (cb)  To assist the City of Picayune, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs, maintenance and improvements at the girls softball field at Picayune Memorial High School................. .................................................... $150,000.00 (cc)  To assist the Administrative Office of the Courts in paying costs associated with technological upgrades, equipment, furnishings, and installation for Courtroom 4 of the Hinds County Courthouse........................................... $50,000.00 (cd)  To assist the City of Hazlehurst, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs, renovations, educational programming, and expansion to the Mississippi Music Museum....................... .................................................... $150,000.00 (ce)  To assist the City of Hazlehurst, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Phase 5 Renovation Project of the Millsaps House............................................... $200,000.00 (cf)  To assist the Village of Beauregard, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction of a community center.................................................... $400,000.00 (cg)  To assist the City of Eupora, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repaving and repair of streets .................................................... $400,000.00 (ch)  To assist the Town of French Camp, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with sidewalk repairs and infrastructure improvements for the town's Downtown Historic Area ..................................................... $75,000.00 (ci)  To assist Choctaw County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road repairs and resurfacing in Beat 3 Choctaw County.................................................... $300,000.00 (cj)  To assist Choctaw County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road repairs and resurfacing in Beat 1 Choctaw County.................................................... $150,000.00 (ck)  To assist Choctaw County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road repairs and resurfacing in Beat 5 Choctaw County.................................................... $150,000.00 (cl)  To provide funds to be distributed equally among the following fire departments in Choctaw County to assist in paying various department costs: Reform Volunteer Fire Department, Town of Ackerman Fire Department, ByWy Volunteer Fire Department, Simpson Volunteer Fire Department, Town of Weir Fire Department, Panhandle Volunteer Fire Department, Union Volunteer Fire Department, Town of French Camp Fire Department.......................................... $200,000.00 (cm)  To provide funds to be distributed equally among the following fire departments in Webster County to assist in paying various department costs: Tomnolen Fire Department, City of Eupora Fire Department and Town of Mathiston Fire Department................ ..................................................... $75,000.00 (cn)  To assist the Town of Ackerman, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road repairs and resurfacing .................................................... $250,000.00 (co)  To assist the Town of Mathiston, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to the town's infrastructure.................................................... $200,000.00 (cp)  To assist VFW Post 3806 in the City of Eupora, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Post building and Post activities........................................... $25,000.00 (cq)  To assist American Legion Post 82 in the Town of Ackerman, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Post building and Post activities................................... $25,000.00 (cr)  To assist the Town of Noxapater, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road repairs and resurfacing............... .................................................... $200,000.00 (cs) To provide funds to be distributed equally among the following fire departments in Winston County to assist in paying various department costs: Nanih Waiya Volunteer Fire Department, Shiloh Fire Department, City of Louisville Fire Department, Lo Butcha Volunteer Fire Department and Beth Eden Volunteer Fire Department.... $100,000.00 (ct)  To assist the Town of Weir, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repainting and other necessary repairs to the water tank.................................................... $200,000.00 (cu)  To assist the City of Grenada, Mississippi, in paying  costs associated with street resurfacing............ $1,000,000.00 (cv)  To assist Grenada County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to the Nat Trout Road and Hawkins Entrance.................................................... $500,000.00 (cw)  To assist Carroll County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with general road resurfacing and maintenance .................................................... $750,000.00 (cx)  To provide funds to be distributed equally among the eighteen (18) volunteer fire departments in Lauderdale County, Mississippi, to assist in paying various department costs........ .................................................... $360,000.00 (cy)  To assist the City of Pontotoc, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with relocating the fire station on Main Street in the city to a less congested corner lot near the current location.................................................. $1,000,000.00 (cz)  To assist the City of Pontotoc, Mississippi, in paying  costs associated with the completion of a pavilion at the gateway to the Tanglefoot Trail..................................... $400,000.00 (da)  To assist the City of Pontotoc, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with building and equipping a training center that provides trainee safety and live fire training to firefighters and first responders, benefitting both the Pontotoc City Fire Department and Pontotoc County volunteer fire departments............ $500,000.00 (db)  To assist the City of Pontotoc, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with renovation of and upgrades, improvements and additions to the Pontotoc Town Square Museum and Post Office building and the McMackin House necessary to provide and improve accessibility to and inside the buildings through the Pontotoc County Historical Society..................................................... $50,000.00 (dc)  To assist the Town of Como, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road infrastructure repairs and improvements..... .................................................... $500,000.00 (dd)  To assist Adams County, Mississippi, with costs associated with the Carthage Point Road drainage repair and flood control project............................................. $500,000.00 (de)  To assist the City of Natchez, Mississippi, for the purpose of providing funding to defray the expenses of the Concord Avenue Drainage Improvement Project for construction costs.............. .................................................... $500,000.00 (df)  To assist the Town of Byhalia, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with relocation of water, sewer, gas utility lines and other equipment currently located on or near Mississippi Highway 309 near the Byhalia schools, and to assist in paying costs associated with street paving improvements to Mississippi Highway 309...... $1,000,000.00 (dg)  To assist the Town of Byhalia, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the renovation of the historic Byhalia High School to provide civic, business, and hospitality for the town $500,000.00 (dh)  To assist the Lafayette County Sheriff's Department in paying costs associated with building a substation in the Harmontown Community with Lafayette County...................... $250,000.00 (di)  To assist the Town of New Houlka, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of a new fire truck .................................................... $150,000.00 (dj)  To assist the City of Houston, Mississippi, in paying  costs associated with repair and overlay of streets including Airport Road, Church Street, Pittsboro Street, Dulaney Street, 1st Avenue, Harrington Street, Washington Street, Hamilton Street, Castle Street, Scott Street, Terrace Road and 6th Avenue .................................................... $400,000.00 (dk)  To assist the Town of Bude, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to the town's existing sewer lagoon for cleaning, removing excessive vegetation and including, but not limited to dredging of sludge and sediment................................. .................................................... $500,000.00 (dl)  To assist the Tennessee Valley Authority in paying costs associated with performing an assessment of the Holly Springs, Mississippi Utility Department and to be used for cutting of the right-of-way of the Holly Springs Utility Department.................. .................................................... $500,000.00 (dm)  To assist Benton County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs to the Benton County Historic Courthouse.......................................... $300,000.00 (dn)  To assist Benton County Sheriff's Department in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment and vehicles $400,000.00 (do)  To assist Benton County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to Benton County Veterans Park .................................................... $300,000.00 (dp)  To assist the Town of Abbeville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs and additions to the town's water system.................................................... $500,000.00 (dq)  To assist Union County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road maintenance on County Road 47 in Supervisors District 2 in Union County........................... $900,000.00 (dr)  To assist DeSoto County, Mississippi, with providing funds to assist in paying costs associated with construction, furnishing and equipping of a training facility for the Walls Volunteer Fire Department.......................................... $250,000.00 (ds)  To assist the City of Hattiesburg, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements in infrastructure in the Midtown area of the city, including, but not limited to, roads, bridges, water, sewer, drainage, sidewalks, stormwater detention, land acquisition, utility relocation and lighting........................................ .................................................. $2,000,000.00 (dt)  To assist the Kiln Utility and Fire District with costs associated with sewer system improvements in the areas of Kiln Delisle Road and Fenton Dedeaux Road .................................................... $500,000.00 (du)  To assist the Town of Caledonia, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase and upgrades of equipment $150,000.00 (dv)  To assist the Town of Caledonia, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with upgrading the town's lighting infrastructure.................................................... $350,000.00 (dw)  To assist the Town of Brooksville, Mississippi, with matching funds for the Federal EPA Stag Grant to complete the town's water and wastewater infrastructure program..................... .................................................... $500,000.00 (dx)  To assist Noxubee County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the county's community sports complex redevelopment project including the addition of bleachers, concession stand, scoreboard, bathrooms and approximately four hundred (400) yards of roadway pavement..................................... $500,000.00 (dy)  To provide funds to be distributed equally among the following fire departments in Scott County, Mississippi, to assist in purchasing equipment: Forest Fire Department, North Scott Volunteer Fire Department, Homewood Volunteer Fire Department, Lake Volunteer Fire Department, Liberty Volunteer Fire Department, Ludlow Volunteer Fire Department, Morton Fire Department and Sebastopol Fire Department.................................................... $200,000.00 (dz)  To assist the City of Forest, Mississippi, in paying  costs associated with constructing and developing a turn lane at a road by Tyson Foods for safety purposes................... $250,000.00 (ea)  To assist the Town of Summit, Mississippi, for purpose of building a fire station for Summit Rural Fire Department $500,000.00 (eb)  To assist Pike County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with renovation and repairs to the Courthouse Complex buildings........................................... $750,000.00 (ec)  To assist Pike County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with a building to house the ladder truck, 18-wheeler tanker truck, rescue pumper and smaller tanker truck for the Sunnyhill Volunteer Fire Department...................................... $250,000.00 (ed)  To assist the City of Columbia, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the RA Johnson Drive stormwater retention pond project............................................. $300,000.00 (ee)  To assist the City of Columbia, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with downtown storm drainage system improvements.................................................... $500,000.00 (ef)  To assist Marion County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with paving roads within the county........ $500,000.00 (eg)  To assist Marion County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with roof repairs......................... $500,000.00 (eh)  To assist the City of Purvis, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with VFW Post 3955 to expand and modernize the facility.................................................... $150,000.00 (ei)  To assist the City of Pearl, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with construction of a bridge extending from the intersection of the extension of Ware Street and relocated St. Augustine Street to Pearson Road in the City of Pearl.................... $500,000.00 (ej)  To assist the Town of Carrollton, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the installation of high speed service via Delta Lightspeed.......................................... $400,000.00 (ek)  To assist the Town of North Carrollton, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the installation of high speed service via Delta Lightspeed..................................... $350,000.00 (el)  To assist the City of Greenwood, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to Yazoo River Trail and Yazoo River Landing............................................. $750,000.00 (em)  To assist Montgomery County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with an emergency generator, 65kw transfer switch, concrete pad and installation for the Stewart Water Association $100,000.00 (en)  To assist the Town of Kilmichael, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with purchasing turnout suits and equipment for the Kilmichael Volunteer Fire Department............................ .................................................... $100,000.00 (eo)  To assist Montgomery County, Mississippi, for the purpose of the Red Hill Volunteer Fire Department............. $250,000.00 (ep)  To assist the City of Winona, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with purchasing a fire truck......... $450,000.00 (eq)  To assist Carroll County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to County Road 83.................. .................................................... $700,000.00 (er)  To assist the City of Tylertown, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements................ .................................................... $500,000.00 (es)  To assist Walthall County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction of a frontage road along the south side of Highway 98 Bypass................................. $750,000.00 (et)  To assist the City of Gautier, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with construction of the Mississippi Songwriters Performing Arts Center............................. $2,000,000.00 (eu)  To assist the City of Gautier, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with constructing an inclusion and Americans With Disabilities Act (ADA) approved park area including, but not limited to, playground equipment for children with disabilities. $1,000,000.00 (ev)  To assist the City of Gautier, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to Town Commons Park, including, but not limited to, parking and through roads for an amphitheater.................................................. $2,000,000.00 (ew)  To assist the City of Water Valley, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with maintenance, repairs and facilitation of broadband service by the city electric department .................................................... $750,000.00 (ex)  To assist the City of Charleston, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvement and restoration of city streets.................................................... $500,000.00 (ey)  To assist Yalobusha County, Mississippi, by providing funds to be used as matching funds for the Tennessee Valley Authority grant for the industrial park........................ $100,000.00 (ez)  To assist the City of Water Valley, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with restoration and maintenance of the Water Valley Civic Center.................................. $250,000.00 (fa)  [Deleted] (fb)  To assist the City of Starkville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the city's Main Street Project............. .................................................. $1,500,000.00 (fc)  To assist the Town of Sumner, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction of a police department building and related facilities............................... $250,000.00 (fd)  To assist the Town of Webb, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction of a community center........... .................................................... $250,000.00 (fe)  To assist Newton County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with purchasing a fire truck............... $250,000.00 (ff)  To assist the Town of Decatur, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of two (2) patrol vehicles and equipment........................................... $125,000.00 (fg)  To assist the Town of Sebastopol, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with a building extension and fixtures for the town police department.................................... $250,000.00 (fh)  To assist the Town of Seminary, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with water and sewer infrastructure improvements.................................................... $250,000.00 (fi)  To assist Jefferson Davis County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to Broome Road................ .................................................... $100,000.00 (fj)  To assist Jones County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with mill and overlay to Graves Road and adjoining streets from Buffalo Hill Road to the city limits of Ellisville, Mississippi, and to extend the project to Mississippi Highway 588, and for other paving projects in the county .................................................... $600,000.00 (fk)  To assist the City of Laurel, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with additions to and expansion of the Veterans Memorial Museum in Laurel, Mississippi........................ $200,000.00 (fl)  To assist Jones County Junior College in paying costs associated with construction of a building to house the School of Design.................................................... $200,000.00 (fm)  To assist the City of Brandon, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure repairs, maintenance, upgrades and improvements....................................... $1,000,000.00 (fn)  To provide funds to be distributed equally among the following fire departments in Jasper County: Bay Springs Volunteer Fire Department, Central Volunteer Fire Department, Fellowship Volunteer Fire Department, Hal Volunteer Fire Department, Lake Eddins Volunteer Fire Department, Louin Volunteer Fire Department, Montrose Volunteer Fire Department, Mossville Volunteer Fire Department, Northeast Jasper Volunteer Fire Department, Paulding Volunteer Fire Department and Rose Hill Volunteer Fire Department....................... $110,000.00 (fo)  To assist Clarke County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure for the new Howard Industrial Expansion Plant, including, but not limited to, water, sewer and fencing $500,000.00 (fp)  To assist the Mississippi Wireless Communication Commission in paying costs associated with adding new statewide communication towers in needed location .....................................................$3,900,000.00 (fq)  To assist Tippah County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the destruction of the old Tippah County Hospital.................................................... $500,000.00 (fr)  To assist the Town of Blue Mountain, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the town's fire department...................................... $50,000.00 (fs)  To assist the Town of Walnut, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the town's fire department.......................................... $100,000.00 (ft)  To assist the City of Ripley, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the city's fire department.......................................... $175,000.00 (fu)  To assist the Town of Falkner, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the town's fire department........................................... $50,000.00 (fv)  To assist the Town of Dumas, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the town's fire department..................................................... $50,000.00 (fw)  To assist Tippah County, Mississippi, in paying costs association with the purchase of equipment for the Tippah County Sheriff's Department................................. $100,000.00 (fx)  To assist the Town of Falkner, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Heritage Museum............. $30,000.00 (fy)  To assist the CREATE Foundation with creating a Target Endowment Fund for various projects in Tippah County, Mississippi ..................................................... $75,000.00 (fz)  To assist VFW Post 4881 in the City of Ripley, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with building maintenance.......................................... $25,000.00 (ga)  To assist American Legion Post 81 in the City of Ripley, Mississippi, with costs associated with building maintenance $25,000.00 (gb)  To assist the Town of Walnut, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with gas system improvements................... ..................................................... $75,000.00 (gc)  To assist Sharkey County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs to the Sharkey County Courthouse located in Rolling Fork, Mississippi.......................... $1,000,000.00 (gd)  To assist Hinds County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with purchasing and installing surveillance cameras on Dixon Road, McCain Avenue and South Drive............................. ..................................................... $25,000.00 (ge)  To assist the City of Verona, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with site work and infrastructure related to the Old Town Project........................................ $500,000.00 (gf)  To assist the Town of Taylorsville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure repair and to upgrade water, sewer and fire protection systems to industrial area.. $350,000.00 (gg)  To assist the City of Guntown, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairing, reconstruction, resurfacing and other improvements such as curbs, drainage to Mike Avenue and to bring the road up to code, and any remaining funds shall be used for costs associated with making improvements to other streets in the city. $750,000.00 (gh)  To assist Prentiss County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with making improvements to roads and bridges in Supervisors District 3 in Prentiss County........................ $300,000.00 (gi)  To assist the Town of Lena, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road and water infrastructure projects............................................ $500,000.00 (gj)  To assist the Town of D'Lo, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with construction of a fire station ..................................................... $50,000.00 (gk)  To assist the Town of D'Lo, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with Phase II of paving town streets including First Street from Highway 149 to South Pine, Second Street from Highway 149 to South Maple, Third Street from Highway 149 to South Maple, Fourth Street from Highway 149 to South Maple and Cemetary Road.......... $250,000.00 (gl)  To assist the Town of D'Lo, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with Phase III of paving town streets including South Oak from Highway 540 to end, West Fifth from Highway 149 to South Oak, East Fifth from Highway 149 to South Oak, West Pecan from Willow Street to Highway 149, and East Pecan from Highway 149 to Water Tower... $250,000.00 (gm)  To assist Rankin County, Mississippi, to provide funds to be distributed equally among the following fire departments in Rankin County:  Cleary Volunteer Fire Department, Star Volunteer Fire Department, Florence Volunteer Fire Department, SW Rankin Volunteer Fire Department and Monterey Volunteer Fire Department...... $75,000.00 (gn)  To assist Copiah County, Mississippi, to provide funds to be distributed equally among the following fire departments in Copiah County:  Crystal Springs Volunteer Fire Department, Hopewell Volunteer Fire Department, New Zion Volunteer Fire Department and Dentville Volunteer Fire Department....................................... ..................................................... $60,000.00 (go)  To assist Simpson County, Mississippi, with costs associated with the Old Pearl Volunteer Fire Department ..................................................... $15,000.00 (gp)  To assist Rankin County, Mississippi, with funds associated with the road connecting U.S. Highway 49 to Pearson Road.................................................... $500,000.00 (gq)  To assist the City of Crystal Springs, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with Chautauqua Park Amphitheater $500,000.00 (gr)  [Deleted] (gs)  To assist the City of Ocean Springs, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with GIS mapping of infrastructure ..................................................... $75,000.00 (gt)  To assist the City of Ocean Springs, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements or adding turn lanes, curbs, drainage and sidewalks............................... $400,000.00 (gu)  To assist the City of Ocean Springs, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with covering the stage located at Fort Maurepas.................................................... $450,000.00 (gv)  To the Mississippi Development Authority for the purpose of providing funding to WISPR Systems in Batesville, Mississippi, for research and development to expand its current small Unmanned Aircraft Systems (sUAS) manufacturing capabilities in Mississippi $500,000.00 (gw)  To assist the Mississippi Organ Recovery Agency in paying costs associated with a statewide communications program............................................. $500,000.00 (gx)  To assist the City of Senatobia, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with water, sewer and road infrastructure renovations in the Downtown Historic District.................................. .................................................. $2,000,000.00 (gy)  To assist Rankin County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements on the I-20 Connector Loop Project........................................... $3,000,000.00 (gz)  To assist the City of Senatobia, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure repairs and improvements at the Senatobia Sports Park................................ $600,000.00 (ha)  To assist the City of Senatobia, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with sewer and water improvements to the New Image Water and Sewer System................................... $2,000,000.00 (hb)  To assist Tate County, Mississippi, with reimbursement of funds for costs associated with Tate County Courthouse parking facility renovations; any remaining funds may be spent on drainage and road repairs as determined by the Tate County Board of Supervisors.................................................. $1,650,000.00 (hc)  To assist the Mississippi Department of Transportation in paying costs associated with improvements at the intersection of Highway 51 and Porter Street, and at the intersection of Highway 4 and I-55 intersection within the city limits of the City of Senatobia, Mississippi.................................................... $750,000.00 (hd)  To assist Northwest Mississippi Community College in paying costs associated with capital infrastructure and repairs to the main campus facilities............................. $2,000,000.00 (he)  To assist the Cottonville-Savage Rural Water Association in paying costs associated with construction, repair and maintenance of, and acquiring equipment for, a water system .................................................... $285,000.00 (hf)  To assist Holmes Community College in paying costs associated with the construction of a new Allied Health building .................................................. $1,000,000.00 (hg)  To assist the Kosciusko School District in paying costs associated with infrastructure, construction and improvements to facilities throughout the district.............................. .................................................. $1,000,000.00 (hh)  To assist the Edinburg Domestic Water Association in paying costs associated with the construction, repair and maintenance of, and acquiring equipment for, a water system..................... .................................................... $150,000.00 (hi)  To assist Leake County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction, repair and renovation of North Jordan Street and Coosa Road.............................. $2,500,000.00 (hj)  To assist Leake County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction, repair and renovation of Red Dog Road.................................................... $925,000.00 (hk)  To assist Leake County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the local workforce initiative of the Leake County Development Association for students in Leake County............. ..................................................... $50,000.00 (hl)  To assist Holmes County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road resurfacing and repairs in Supervisors District 2 of the county.......................................... $500,000.00 (hm)  To assist the City of Carthage, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction, repair and renovation of the Carthage Coliseum.................................. $1,000,000.00 (hn)  To assist Leake County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with acquiring firefighting equipment for Leake County fire departments......................................... $100,000.00 (ho)  To assist the Town of West, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements, renovations and rehabilitation of existing town properties, including, but not limited to, the Welcome Center, City Hall, Old City Hall and the Library, as well as the purchase of a new police vehicle, including the necessary equipment to outfit the vehicle................................. .................................................... $300,000.00 (hp)  To assist Attala County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction of an Attala County Fire Station, an Emergency Operations Center and E-911 Telecommunications Center.......................... $3,600,000.00 (hq)  To assist Attala County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the repair or replacement of the roof for the Old Jack Post Industrial Building............................. $850,000.00 (hr)  To assist the City of Kosciusko, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction, renovation and rehabilitation of the Strand Theatre................................... $500,000.00 (hs)  To assist the Carmack Community Club in Attala County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the renovation, construction and rehabilitation of a building for the club......... $200,000.00 (ht)  To assist the Possumneck-Carmack Water Association in paying costs associated with the construction, repair and maintenance of, and acquiring equipment for, the water association............... .................................................... $150,000.00 (hu)  To assist Zama Water Association in paying costs associated with the construction, repair and maintenance of, and acquiring equipment for, the water association........ $150,000.00 (hv)  To assist the Department of Finance and Administration in paying costs associated with the program established under Section 3 of House Bill No. 419, 2023 Regular Session.............. $300,000.00 (hw)  To assist Jasper County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and improvements to roads and bridges.......................................... $ 1,100,000.00 (hx)  To assist the Town of Heidelberg, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements................ ................................................. $ 300,000.00 (hy)  To assist the City of Bay Springs, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements................ ................................................. $ 150,000.00 (hz)  To assist the East Jasper Consolidated School District in paying costs associated with repairs and renovations of the old Heidelberg Academy................................ $ 150,000.00 (ia)  To assist Forrest County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs and improvements on Monroe Road Extension......................................... $ 325,000.00 (ib)  To assist Lawrence County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with pavement maintenance for the N.A. Sandifer Highway $ 1,000,000.00 (ic)  To assist Lincoln County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs and renovations to the county courthouse $   250,000.00 (id)  To assist Holmes County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements..................... ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (ie)  To assist the City of Lexington, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with renovations to the city hall and the municipal fire station.......................................... $ 500,000.00 (if)  To assist the Town of Tchula, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and improvements to town streets.......................................... $ 250,000.00 (ig)  To assist the City of Olive Branch, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the improvement and expansion of aircraft hangers.......................................... $ 1,500,000.00 (ih)  To assist Marshall County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with building the Chickasaw Trail Emergency Response Center................................................. $ 1,500,000.00 (ii)  To assist Desoto County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with a parking lot and staging improvements at the National Guard Armory...................................... $ 500,000.00 (ij)  To assist the City of Byram, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with drainage repair projects........................ ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (ik)  To assist the City of Byram, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to the Terry Road Bridge............ ................................................. $ 250,000.00. (il)  To assist the Town of Terry, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the * * *renovation constructing, furnishing and equipping of a community center * * *and improvements to Main Street............................ $ 300,000.00 (im)  [Deleted] (in)  To assist the City of Oxford, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction of a new police station.. $ 1,000,000.00 (io)  To assist Panola County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements at the Panola County Airport.......................................... $ 500,000.00 (ip)  To assist the City of Louisville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements for the North and South Industrial Road Project........................... $ 2,000,000.00 (iq)  To assist Neshoba County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the Neshoba County Sheriff's Department.............................. $ 200,000.00 (ir)  To assist the Brewer Community Association, Inc., in paying costs associated with the improvement and operation of the community center in Brewer, Mississippi............ $ 150,000.00 (is)  To assist Tammy Wynette Legacy Park in paying costs associated with the improvement and operation of the Tammy Wynette Legacy Center in the Town of Tremont, Mississippi...................... ................................................. $ 150,000.00 (it)  To assist the Prairie Rural Community Development Club in paying costs associated with the improvement and operation of the former Prairie School in Prairie, Mississippi.......................... ................................................. $ 150,000.00 (iu)  To assist the City of Tupelo, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to Ballard Park including, but not limited to, inclusive playground equipment and any necessary playground equipment for special needs children............................ ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (iv)  To assist Jefferson County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements to roads and bridges $   100,000.00 (iw)  To assist Claiborne County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements..................... ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (ix)  To assist Claiborne County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to law enforcement facilities........................................ $ 225,000.00 (iy)  To assist Copiah County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the demolition of the former hospital complex in the City of Hazlehurst..................................... $ 75,000.00 (iz)  To assist the City of Natchez, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with various drainage projects................. ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (ja)  To assist the Gulfport Redevelopment Commission in paying costs associated with a mixed-use downtown development project, including general infrastructure to leverage public and private investment $ 2,000,000.00 (jb)  To assist the City of Magee, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements..................... ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (jc)  To assist the City of Mendenhall, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements................ ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (jd)  To assist the Village of Puckett, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements................ ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (je)  To assist Montgomery County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the installation of traffic signals at the intersection of U.S. Highway 82 and Middleton Road and at the intersection of U.S. Highway 82 and Mission Road..................................... ................................................. $ 700,000.00 (jf)  To assist Grenada County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to Nat G. Trout Road................ ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (jg)  To assist the Kosciusko School District in paying costs associated with renovations and improvements to the Skipworth Auditorium................................................. $ 500,000.00 (jh)  To assist Attala County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the repair and/or replacement of the roof of the Jack Post Industrial Building.......................... $ 250,000.00 (ji)  To assist the City of Kosciusko, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs and renovations to the Strand........................................... $ 250,000.00 (jj)  To assist Greene County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the Emergency 911 Call Center........................................... $ 705,000.00 (jk)  To assist Greene County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction of a county-owned building......................................... $ 400,000.00 (jl)  To assist Greene County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the rehabilitation and repair of the Greene County Rural Events Center..................................... $   600,000.00 (jm)  To assist the Mississippi Department of Transportation in paying costs associated with widening and improvements to State Highway/Old Highway 63 from Highway 57 to Highway 63 in Greene County, Mississippi....................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (jn)  To assist George County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements..................... ................................................. $ 300,000.00 (jo)  To assist Greene County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements..................... ................................................. $ 550,000.00 (jp)  To assist the Town of State Line, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with Hurricane Zeta.............. $   250,000.00 (jq)  To assist Wayne County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the repair and upgrades to courtrooms............ ................................................. $ 75,000.00 (jr)  To assist the City of D'Iberville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the extension of Mallet Road............... ................................................. $ 2,500,000.00 (js)  To assist the Mississippi State University Research and Technology Corporation in paying costs associated with the Mississippi Cybersecurity Center adjacent to Keesler Air Force Base $15,000,000.00 (jt)  To assist the Jackson County School District in paying costs associated with repairs and renovations to facilities at St. Martin High School...................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (ju)  To assist Jackson County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with upgrades at the intersection of Jim Ramsey Road and Old Fort Bayou Road................................... $ 500,000.00 (jv)  To assist the City of Ocean Springs, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs and restoration of the Mary C. O'Keefe Cultural Arts Center...................... $ 250,000.00 (jw)  To assist the Lamar County School District in paying costs associated with the development of the new courtyard at the Sumrall High School...................................... $ 1,400,000.00 (jx)  To assist the Town of Seminary, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with water and sewer improvements............... ................................................. $ 250,000.00 (jy)  To assist the City of Collins, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with water and sewer improvement near the Collins Civic Center........................................... $ 400,000.00 (jz)  To assist the City of Flowood, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements on Flowood Drive $ 1,500,000.00 (ka)  To assist the City of Flowood, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements on Liberty Road and at Liberty Park...................................... $ 1,250,000.00 (kb)  To assist Rankin County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements on the I-20 Connector Loop Project.......................................... $ 4,500,000.00 (kc)  To assist the City of Meridian, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements to North Hills Street from Highway 19 to Highway 39..................... $ 3,400,000.00 (kd)  To assist the Kemper County School District in paying costs associated with software and training programs for the Career and Technical Education Center........................ $ 200,000.00 (ke)  To assist the City of Picayune, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements................ ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (kf)  To assist the City of Poplarville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of public safety vehicles, public works vehicles and equipment, fire protection purchases, street paving and drainage improvements......................... $ 1,000,000.00 (kg)  To assist the City of Vicksburg, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs to the Fisher Ferry Bridge.......................................... $ 4,000,000.00 (kh)  To assist the City of Vicksburg, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements................ ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (ki)  To assist the South Delta School District in paying costs associated with asbestos demolition and remediation.............. ................................................. $ 350,000.00 (kj)  To assist with Pearl River Valley Water Supply District for the dredging fund............................. $ 2,000,000.00 (kk)  To assist the Lighthouse Academy for Dyslexia in Ocean Springs with costs associated for general purposes for dyslexia services................................................... $ 195,000.00 (kl)  To assist the Culkin Water District with the reconstruction of water lines for an industrial park, schools, hospital and other accounts................................ $ 1,500,000.00 (km)  To assist Warren County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with upgrades and improvements to the historic Old Courthouse and grounds in Vicksburg.......................... $ 2,000,000.00 (kn)  To assist Yazoo County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with construction and repairs to the Lake George Bridge $ 3,000,000.00 (ko)  To assist the City of Ridgeland, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction of the Commerce Park Connector Road............................................. $ 2,000,000.00 (kp)  To assist the City of Jackson, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs, renovation and upgrades to the Jackson Planetarium....................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (kq)  To assist the City of Jackson, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs, renovations and upgrades to Thalia Mara Hall............................................. $ 1,500,000.00 (kr)  To assist the Town of Bolton, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs and renovations to the * * *volunteer fire police department ....................................... $ 50,000.00 (ks)  To assist Tunica County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and improvements and traffic signal upgrades on Casino Strip Resort Boulevard....................... ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (kt)  To assist the Town of Lambert, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with equipment purchases for the town's fire department................................................. $ 100,000.00 (ku)  To assist the City of Hattiesburg, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements in infrastructure in the Midtown area of the city, including, but not limited to, roads, bridges, water, sewer, drainage, sidewalks, stormwater detention, land acquisition, utility relocation and lighting........................................ ................................................. $ 2,000,000.00 (kv)  To assist Perry County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction of a roadway and a bridge to access the Perry County Industrial Park...................... $ 750,000.00 (kw)  To assist the City of Greenwood, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements................ ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (kx)  To assist the Mississippi Development Authority in providing reimbursements for Major League Baseball mandated alterations and improvements to Trustmark Park................ $ 1,300,000.00 (ky)  To assist the Town of Gloster, Mississippi, in paying costs associated for infrastructure improvements to Gloster Road, Georgia Pacific 1 Road, Georgia Pacific 2 Road, Pepper House Road and East Railroad Avenue................................... $ 2,500,000.00 (kz)  To assist the City of Pearl, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with lighting improvements on U.S. Highway 80 $ 1,500,000.00 (la)  To assist the City of Richland, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the U.S. Highway 49 pedestrian crossover.. $   500,000.00 (lb)  To assist the City of Newton, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with demolition, repairs and renovations of the Medical and Community Facility............................ $ 1,500,000.00 (lc)  To assist the City of Forest, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements to Jack Lee Drive and Old Morton Road.................................. $   250,000.00 (ld)  To assist the City of Hernando, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the installation of a roundabout at the intersection of U.S. Highway 51 and Oak Grove Road............... ................................................. $ 1,500,000.00 (le)  To assist Lee County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the acquisition of real property adjacent to Turner Industrial Park for the purpose of site expansion and rail spur improvements...................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (lf)  To assist Lee County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of a fire truck for the Richmond Fire Department in the Richmond community of Lee County............... ................................................. $ 358,000.00 (lg)  To assist the City of Saltillo, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction of a new fire station.... $ 1,000,000.00 (lh)  To assist the City of Gluckstadt, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction of a municipal court building and a police station.................................. $ 750,000.00 (li)  To assist the City of Madison, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Madison Avenue bypass to U.S. Highway 51    $ 2,000,000.00 (lj)  To assist the City of Bay St. Louis, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements......... ................................................. $ 250,000.00 (lk)  To assist Hancock County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements..................... ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (ll)  To assist the City of Waveland, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements................ ................................................. $ 250,000.00 (lm)  To assist the Horn Lake Creek Basin Interceptor Sewer District in paying the costs associated with infrastructure improvements................................................. $ 2,000,000.00 (ln)  To assist the Twenty-third Circuit Court District in paying costs associated with the District Attorney's Office...... ................................................. $ 275,000.00 (lo)  To assist the City of Southaven, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with traffic signal and intersection improvements at Stateline Road and Swinnea Road................... $ 300,000.00 (lp)  To assist the City of Southaven, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with upgrades and improvements to Snowden Grove Park $   500,000.00 (lq)  To assist the City of Southaven, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with a traffic signal and intersection improvements at Church Road and Tchulahoma Road................................. ................................................. $ 350,000.00 (lr)  To assist Horn Lake Water Association, Inc. in paying costs associated with a water meter replacement................. ................................................. $ 250,000.00 (ls)  To assist Alcorn County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements to the Industrial Access Roadway.......................................... $ 500,000.00 (lt)  To assist the City of Corinth, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Polk Street bridge replacement project $ 1,500,000.00 (lu)  To assist Blue Mountain Christian University in paying costs associated with the nursing school........... $   250,000.00 (lv)  To assist the City of Farmington, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the purchase of vehicles and equipment for the police department................................. $ 100,000.00 (lw)  To assist Lamar County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements to the roundabout at Oak Grove Road and Weathersby Road.................... $ 1,500,000.00 (lx)  To assist the Jackson County Economic Development Foundation in paying costs associated with the employment of career coaches for the Jackson County School District.................. ................................................. $ 600,000.00 (ly)  To assist Jackson County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road and bridge repairs in Supervisor District 1 $   300,000.00 (lz)  To assist Washington County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair and renovations of Estes Street, Airdale Drive, Sidney Street.................................................. ................................................. $ 600,000.00 (ma)  To assist the Town of Metcalfe, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs, renovations and technological enhancements of town hall............ $   100,000.00 (mb)  To assist the Town of Benoit, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs, renovations and technological enhancements of town hall............ $   100,000.00 (mc)  To assist the City of Leland, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs, renovations and technological enhancements of city hall............ $    75,000.00 (md)  To assist Washington County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements, renovations, repairs and upgrades to the Greenville Mid-Delta Airport...................... $ 500,000.00 (me)  To assist the City of Cleveland, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure and drainage improvements...................................... $ 500,000.00 (mf)  To assist Bolivar County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the expansion of the Terrene Landing River Boat Dock and improvements to Terrene Landing Road............................ ................................................. $ 400,000.00 (mg)  To assist Tishomingo County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the repair, renovation and expansion of the General Building 1016 at the Tri-State Commerce Park.................... ................................................. $ 650,000.00 (mh)  To assist the City of Fulton, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with construction, renovation and repair of an acquired building to repurpose for use as the city hall.................. ................................................. $ 250,000.00 (mi)  To assist the Town of Marietta, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements................ ................................................. $ 200,000.00 (mj)  To assist the Town of Mantachie, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements for the Fawn Grove Industrial Park................................... $ 148,000.00 (mk)  To assist the Town of Tishomingo, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the replacement of gate valves and other water infrastructure projects........................... $ 150,000.00 (ml)  To assist the Village of Paden, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the repairs and renovations of a village-owned industrial building............................... $ 150,000.00 (mm)  To assist Itawamba County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs and renovations to the RCDC facilities....................................... $ 40,000.00 (mn)  To assist Tishomingo County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs and renovations at the Old Historical Courthouse............................. $ 100,000.00 (mo)  To assist the Town of Bruce, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with equipment upgrades and other purchases for the town's police department................................. $ 50,000.00 (mp)  To assist the Town of New Houlka, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of a fire truck............... ................................................. $ 125,000.00 (mq)  To assist Calhoun County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the repairs, paving and improvements of County Road 137................................................. $ 125,000.00 (mr)  To assist Calhoun County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the repairs, paving and improvements of County Road 306................................................. $ 1,000,000.00 (ms)  To assist the Pat Harrison Waterway District in paying costs associated with the relocation of a boat ramp.............. ................................................. $ 100,000.00 (mt)  To assist the Mississippi Department of Transportation in paying costs associated with a turn lane and traffic signal at the intersection of McArthur Street and Highway 145 in Quitman, Mississippi................................................. $ 100,000.00 (mu)  To assist Clarke County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of vehicles and equipment for the Clarke County Sherriff's Department.................................... ................................................. $ 100,000.00 (mv)  To assist Yazoo County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs and improvements to roads and bridges... $   500,000.00 (mw)  To assist the Town of Cary, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction of a fire station............... ................................................. $ 250,000.00 (mx)  To assist Yazoo City, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the repair and renovation of the Triangle Cultural Center................................................. $ 200,000.00 (my)  To assist the City of Long Beach, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements................ ................................................. $ 750,000.00 (mz)  To assist the City of Pass Christian, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements......... ................................................. $ 750,000.00 (na)  To assist the City of Macon, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of fire trucks and firefighting equipment for the city's fire department.................................. ................................................. $ 350,000.00 (nb)  To assist the City of West Point, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and improvements to streets................................................. $ 1,000,000.00 (nc)  To assist Tate County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements for the Chrome-Craft Redevelopment project............................. $ 1,000,000.00 (nd)  To assist Union County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements in Supervisor District 1  $   300,000.00 (ne)  To assist Union County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements in Supervisor District 2  $   300,000.00 (nf)  To assist the Town of Potts Camp, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements................ ................................................. $ 300,000.00 (ng)  To assist Jackson County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the engineering and construction of the Jackson County Blueway Connection, along the Pascagoula River.................. ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (nh)  To assist the City of Pascagoula, Mississippi, in defraying expenses associated with a police substation for East Pascagoula........................................ $ 1,500,000.00 (ni)  To assist the City of Ocean Springs, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements......... ................................................. $ 600,000.00 (nj)  To assist the City of Starkville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Starkville Main Street Project.......................................... $ 500,000.00 (nk)  To assist Oktibbeha County, Mississippi, with costs associated with roof repairs to the Town of Maben's Fire Department........................................ $ 50,000.00 (nl)  To assist Oktibbeha County, Mississippi, in providing funds to be distributed equally among the following fire departments to assist in paying various department costs:  Adaton Self Creek Volunteer Fire Department, Central Oktibbeha Fire Department, Maben Fire Department, and Sturgis/District 4 Volunteer Fire Department.... $   200,000.00 (nm)  To assist Webster County, Mississippi, with costs associated with the repairs and maintenance of the Volunteer Fire Departments buildings............................. $ 250,000.00 (nn)  To assist the City of Eupora, Mississippi, with costs associated with the purchase of a police vehicle................ ................................................. $ 55,000.00 (no)  To assist the Town of Weir, Mississippi, with costs associated with infrastructure improvement projects and purchasing vehicles for the police department................. $ 45,000.00 (np)  To assist the Community Foundation for Mississippi in paying costs associated with providing direct services for reading intervention and training for teachers, and with renovations to building space to provide such services.................................. ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (nq)  To assist the Marty Stuart Congress of Country Music Museum in paying costs associated with the construction of Phase 2 of the museum in the City of Philadelphia, Mississippi; however, no funds may be disbursed for such purposes until the Department of Finance and Administration is provided proof that the museum, museum owner or museum governing body, as applicable, possesses the ownership rights to all Marty Stuart memorabilia, exhibits and/or other items or material displayed in the museum or has a written binding agreement to display Marty Stuart memorabilia and/or similar memorabilia for a period of at least twenty-five (25) years...................... $10,000,000.00 (nr)  To provide funds to the Three Rivers Solid Waste Management Authority to construct, repair, renovate, expand, enhance, improve, and equip the Three Rivers Regional Landfill in the City of Pontotoc, Mississippi, and the three (3) Authority Transfer Stations located in the City of Oxford, Mississippi, Lee County, Mississippi, and Monroe County, Mississippi...................................... .................................................. $4,000,000.00 (ns)  To assist the Chickasaw Inkana Foundation in paying costs associated with the construction, furnishing and equipping of the Chickasaw Heritage Center in the City of Tupelo, Mississippi $4,950,000.00 (nt)  To assist the Scenic Rivers Development Alliance in paying costs associated with the Okhissa Lake Development Project.................................................. $8,000,000.00 (nu)  To assist the City of Tupelo, Mississippi, with a match to federal funds for the construction of railroad improvements that run through the city for public safety and economic development improvements.................................................. $4,600,000.00 (nv)  To assist Camp Kamassa in defraying expenses related to construction of buildings, facilities, complexes and related infrastructure..................................... $4,000,000.00 (nw)  To assist Hinds Community College in paying costs associated with construction of the Health Science Complex at the Rankin Campus........................................... $16,000,000.00 (nx)  To assist the Columbus Redevelopment Authority in paying costs associated with the Park View - Burns Bottom Project........................................... $3,000,000.00 (ny)  To the Prentiss County School District for upgrades to equipment, furnishings and facilities for the CTE program at Wheeler Attendance Center.................................. $1,000,000.00 (nz)  To the Grenada School District for upgrades to equipment, furnishings and facilities for the CTE program.................. .................................................. $3,000,000.00 (oa)  To the Itawamba County School District for upgrades to equipment, furnishings and facilities for the CTE program including equipment for aiding in logistics and maintenance... $4,000,000.00 (ob)  To the George County School District for upgrades to equipment, furnishings and facilities for the CTE program........ .................................................. $1,000,000.00 (oc)  To the Jackson County School District for upgrades to equipment, furnishings and facilities for the CTE program at three high schools:  East Central, Vancleave and St. Martin................ .................................................. $9,000,000.00 (od)  To the South Tippah School District for upgrades to equipment, furnishings and facilities for the CTE program........ .................................................... $500,000.00 (oe)  To the Senatobia Municipal School District for upgrades to equipment, furnishings and facilities for the CTE program $500,000.00 (of)  To the Attala County School District for upgrades to equipment, furnishings and facilities for the CTE program at Kosciusko-Attala County Career Tech Center................... $2,000,000.00 (og)  To the Greene County School District for upgrades to equipment, furnishings and facilities for the CTE program........ .................................................. $2,000,000.00 (oh)  To the Lee County School District for upgrades to equipment, furnishings and facilities for the CTE program........ .................................................... $350,000.00 (oi)  To the Wayne County School District for upgrades to equipment, furnishings and facilities for the CTE program........ .................................................... $500,000.00 (oj)  To Long Beach High School for upgrades to equipment, furnishings and facilities for the CTE program.................. .................................................. $1,000,000.00 (ok)  To the Newton County School System for upgrades to equipment, furnishings and facilities for the CTE program........ .................................................. $2,000,000.00 (ol)  To the Tupelo Public School District for upgrades to equipment, furnishings and facilities for the CTE program........ ................................................... $350,000.00. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.